Massachusetts, session 194th, H2643.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (d) of Section 16 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. Section 150 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby repealed.
of 1